Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.150

Compromise and settlement of claims by attorney general.

After commencement of an action in a court of competent jurisdiction upon a claim against the state, or any of its officers, employees, or volunteers arising out of tortious conduct or pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., or against a foster parent that the attorney general is defending pursuant to RCW 4.92.070, or upon petition by the state, the attorney general, with the prior approval of the office of risk management and with the approval of the court, following such testimony as the court may require, may compromise and settle the same and stipulate for judgment against the state, the affected officer, employee, volunteer, or foster parent.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 514; 2002 c 332 s 15; 1989 c 403 s 4. Prior: 1985 c 217 s 5; 1985 c 188 s 9; 1979 ex.s. c 144 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 126 s 5; 1963 c 159 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Findings—1989 c 403: See note following RCW 4.92.060.